Utah statutes.
78B-1-119.   Jurors and witnesses -- Fees and mileage.

(1)  Every juror and witness legally required or in good faith requested to attend a trial court of record or not of record or a grand jury is entitled to:

(a) $18.50 for the first day of attendance and $49 per day for each subsequent day of attendance; and

(b)  if traveling more than 50 miles, $1 for each four miles in excess of 50 miles actually and necessarily traveled in going only, regardless of county lines.

(2)  Persons in the custody of a penal institution upon conviction of a criminal offense are not entitled to a witness fee.

(3)  A witness attending from outside the state in a civil case is allowed mileage at the rate of 25 cents per mile and is taxed for the distance actually and necessarily traveled inside the state in going only.

(4)  If the witness is attending from outside the state in a criminal case, the state shall reimburse the witness under Section 77-21-3.

(5)  A prosecution witness or a witness subpoenaed by an indigent defendant attending from outside the county but within the state may receive reimbursement for necessary lodging and meal expenses under rule of the Judicial Council.

(6)  There is created within the General Fund, a restricted account known as the CASA Volunteer Account.  A juror may donate the juror's fee to the CASA Volunteer Account in $18.50 or $49 increments.  The Legislature shall annually appropriate money from the CASA Volunteer Account to the Administrative Office of the Courts for the purpose of recruiting, training, and supervising volunteers for the Court Appointed Special Advocate program established pursuant to Section 78A-6-902.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

